Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 22

PRESIDING
OFFICERS, CLERKS, AND STAFF

Section

22-1 Presiding officer, tenure

22-2 Succession to presiding office of senate
and house of

representatives

22-3 Clerk, tenure

22-4 Permanent staffing

22-5 Payment of legislative bills and accounts

22-6 Notice of proposed constitutional
amendments

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next